Florida, session 2026, SB1688.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (4), paragraph (a) of subsection (5), 12 and subsection (7) of section 796.07, Florida Statutes, are 13 amended, and subsection (2) of that section is republished, to 14 read: 15 796.07âProhibiting prostitution and related acts.â 16 (2)âIt is unlawful: 17 (a)âTo own, establish, maintain, or operate any place, 18 structure, building, or conveyance for the purpose of lewdness, 19 assignation, or prostitution. 20 (b)âTo offer, or to offer or agree to secure, another for 21 the purpose of prostitution or for any other lewd or indecent 22 act. 23 (c)âTo receive, or to offer or agree to receive, any person 24 into any place, structure, building, or conveyance for the 25 purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation, or to permit 26 any person to remain there for such purpose. 27 (d)âTo direct, take, or transport, or to offer or agree to 28 direct, take, or transport, any person to any place, structure, 29 or building, or to any other person, with knowledge or 30 reasonable cause to believe that the purpose of such directing, 31 taking, or transporting is prostitution, lewdness, or 32 assignation. 33 (e)âFor a person 18 years of age or older to offer to 34 commit, or to commit, or to engage in, prostitution, lewdness, 35 or assignation. 36 (f)âTo solicit, induce, entice, or procure another to 37 commit prostitution, lewdness, or assignation. 38 (g)âTo reside in, enter, or remain in, any place, 39 structure, or building, or to enter or remain in any conveyance, 40 for the purpose of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation. 41 (h)âTo aid, abet, or participate in any of the acts or 42 things enumerated in this subsection. 43 (i)âTo purchase the services of any person engaged in 44 prostitution. 45 (4)(a)âA person who violates any provision of this section, 46 other than paragraph (2)(e) or paragraph (2)(g) (2)(f), commits: 47 (a)1.âA misdemeanor of the first second degree for a first 48 violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 49 (b)2.âA felony misdemeanor of the third first degree for a 50 second violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s. 51 775.083, or 775.084. 52 (c)3.âA felony of the second third degree for a third or 53 subsequent violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 54 775.083, or s. 775.084. 55 (b)âA person who is charged with a third or subsequent 56 violation of this section, other than paragraph (2)(f), shall be 57 offered admission to a pretrial intervention program or a 58 substance abuse treatment program as provided in s. 948.08. 59 (5)(a)âA person who violates paragraph (2)(e) or paragraph 60 (2)(g) (2)(f) commits: 61 1.âA misdemeanor of the second first degree for a first 62 violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 63 2.âA misdemeanor felony of the first third degree for a 64 second violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or , s. 65 775.083, or s. 775.084. 66 3.âA felony of the third second degree for a third or 67 subsequent violation, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 68 775.083, or s. 775.084. 69 (7)âIf the place, structure, building, or conveyance that 70 is owned, established, maintained, or operated in violation of 71 paragraph (2)(a) is a massage establishment that is or should be 72 licensed under s. 480.043, the offense shall be reclassified to 73 the next higher degree as follows: 74 (a)âA misdemeanor of the first second degree for a first 75 violation is reclassified as a felony misdemeanor of the third 76 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, or s. 77 775.083, or s. 775.084. 78 (b)âA felony misdemeanor of the third first degree for a 79 second violation is reclassified as a felony of the second third 80 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 81 775.084. 82 (c)âA felony of the second third degree for a third or 83 subsequent violation is reclassified as a felony of the first 84 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 85 or s. 775.084. 86 Section 2.âParagraph (l) of subsection (4) and paragraph 87 (q) of subsection (5) of section 456.074, Florida Statutes, are 88 amended to read: 89 456.074âCertain health care practitioners; immediate 90 suspension of license.â 91 (4)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 92 suspending the license of a massage therapist and establishment 93 as those terms are defined in chapter 480 upon receipt of 94 information that the massage therapist; the designated 95 establishment manager as defined in chapter 480; an employee of 96 the establishment; a person with an ownership interest in the 97 establishment; or, for a corporation that has more than $250,000 98 of business assets in this state, the owner, officer, or 99 individual directly involved in the management of the 100 establishment has been arrested for committing or attempting, 101 soliciting, or conspiring to commit, or convicted or found 102 guilty of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere 103 to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07 or a 104 felony offense under any of the following provisions of state 105 law or a similar provision in another jurisdiction: 106 (l)âSection 796.07(4)(c) 796.07(4)(a)3., relating to a 107 felony of the second third degree for a third or subsequent 108 violation of s. 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution and 109 related acts. 110 (5)âThe department shall issue an emergency order 111 suspending the license of any health care practitioner who is 112 arrested for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring 113 to commit any act that would constitute a violation of any of 114 the following criminal offenses in this state or similar 115 offenses in another jurisdiction: 116 (q)âSection 796.07(4)(c) 796.07(4)(a)3., relating to a 117 felony of the second third degree for a third or subsequent 118 violation of s. 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution and 119 related acts. 120 Section 3.âParagraph (l) of subsection (6) of section 121 480.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 122 480.041âMassage therapists; qualifications; licensure; 123 endorsement.â 124 (6)âThe board shall deny an application for a new or 125 renewal license if an applicant has been convicted or found 126 guilty of, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, 127 regardless of adjudication, a violation of s. 796.07(2)(a) which 128 is reclassified under s. 796.07(7) or a felony offense under any 129 of the following provisions of state law or a similar provision 130 in another jurisdiction: 131 (l)âSection 796.07(4)(c) 796.07(4)(a)3., relating to a 132 felony of the second third degree for a third or subsequent 133 violation of s. 796.07, relating to prohibiting prostitution and 134 related acts. 135 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.